Utah statutes.
67-5-17.   Attorney-client relationship.
(1)  When representing the governor, lieutenant governor, auditor, or
treasurer, or when representing an agency under the supervision of any of
those officers, the attorney general shall:
(a)  keep the officer or the officer's designee reasonably informed about the
status of a matter and promptly comply with reasonable requests for
information;
(b)  explain a matter to the extent reasonably necessary to enable the officer
or the officer's designee to make informed decisions regarding the
representation;
(c)  abide by the officer's or designee's decisions concerning the objectives
of the representation and consult with the officer or designee as to the means
by which they are to be pursued; and
(d)  jointly by agreement, establish protocols with the officer to facilitate
communications and working relationships with the officer or agencies under
the officer's supervision.
(2)  Nothing in Subsection (1) modifies or supercedes any independent legal
authority granted specifically by statute to the attorney general.
(3)  When the attorney general institutes or maintains a civil enforcement
action on behalf of the state of Utah that is not covered under Subsection
(1), the attorney general shall:
(a)  fully advise the governor, as the officer in whom the executive authority
of the state is vested, before instituting the action, entering into a
settlement or consent decree, or taking an appeal; and
(b)  keep the governor reasonably informed about the status of the matter and
promptly comply with reasonable requests for information.
(4)  In a civil action not covered under Subsection (1) or (3), the attorney
general shall:
(a)  keep the governor reasonably informed about the status of the matter and
promptly comply with reasonable requests for information;
(b)  explain the matter to the extent reasonably necessary to enable the
governor to make informed decisions regarding the representation; and
(c)  abide by the governor's decisions concerning the objectives of the
representation and consult with the governor as to the means by which they are
to be pursued.
(5)  The governor may appear in any civil legal action involving the state and
appoint legal counsel to advise or appear on behalf of the governor.  The
court shall allow the governor's appearance.
